South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5284.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Counties exempt from Clerk of Court performing Register of Deeds duties SECTION 1.    Section 30-5-10(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) In every county in the State other than Abbeville, Aiken, Anderson, Beaufort, Berkeley, Charleston, Cherokee, Chesterfield, Clarendon, Colleton, Dorchester, Florence, Georgetown, Greenville, Horry, Jasper, Kershaw, Lancaster, Lexington, Oconee, Orangeburg, Pickens, Richland, Spartanburg, and Sumter the duties prescribed by law for the register of deeds must be performed by the clerk of court who has all the powers and emoluments given the register of deeds in Abbeville, Aiken, Anderson, Beaufort, Berkeley, Charleston, Cherokee, Chesterfield, Clarendon, Colleton, Dorchester, Florence, Georgetown, Greenville, Horry, Jasper, Kershaw, Lancaster, Lexington, Oconee, Orangeburg, Pickens, Richland, Spartanburg, and Sumter counties. Counties appointing Register of Deeds SECTION 2.    Section 30-5-12(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) The governing bodies of Abbeville, Anderson, Beaufort, Cherokee, Chesterfield, Clarendon, Colleton, Florence, Georgetown, Horry, Jasper, Kershaw, Lancaster, Oconee, Orangeburg, and Pickens counties shall appoint the register of deeds for its county under terms and conditions as it may agree upon. Time effective SECTION 3.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 19th day of May, 2026. __________